Hawaii statutes.
PART VI.
PENALTIES, ADMINISTRATIVE FINES AND PROHIBITED ACTS

§412:2-600 Applicability of part. (a)
The provisions of this part shall apply to all Hawaii financial institutions
and to such other persons as shall, by violating any of the provisions of this
part, be subject to the penalties and administrative fines provided in this
part. The provisions of this part shall be in addition to the prohibitions set
forth elsewhere in this chapter.

(b) If a contract is made or any other act is
done or omitted in good faith reliance on an interpretation of this chapter
made by the supreme court of this State or in a rule duly adopted by the
commissioner pursuant to chapter 91, no penalty imposed by this chapter shall
apply, notwithstanding that after such contract is made, such interpretation or
rule is amended, rescinded, or determined by judicial or other authority to be
invalid for any reason. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next